California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 amount equal to 0.00165 multiplied by the amount handled on advance deposit wagers that originate in California for each racing meeting shall be distributed as follows:

(A) One-half of the amount shall be distributed to supplement the trainer-administered pension plans for backstretch personnel established pursuant to Section 19613. Moneys distributed pursuant to this subparagraph shall supplement, and not supplant, moneys distributed to that fund pursuant to Section 19613 or any other provision of law.

(B) One-half of the amount shall be distributed to the welfare fund established for the benefit of horsemen and backstretch personnel pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19641. Moneys distributed pursuant to this subparagraph shall supplement, and not supplant, moneys distributed
 to that fund pursuant to Section 19641 or any other provision of law.

(4) With respect to wagers on each breed of racing that originate in California, an amount equal to 2 percent of the first two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) of handle from all advance deposit wagers originating from within California annually, an amount equal to 1.5 percent of the next two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) of handle from all advance deposit wagers originating from within California annually, an amount equal to 1 percent of the next two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) of handle from all advance deposit wagers originating from within California annually, and an amount equal to 0.50 percent of handle from all advance deposit wagers originating from within California in excess of seven hundred fifty million dollars
 ($750,000,000) annually, shall be distributed as satellite wagering commissions. Satellite wagering facilities that were not operational in 2001, other than one each in the Cities of Inglewood and San Mateo, and two additional facilities each operated by the Alameda County Fair and the Los Angeles County Fair and their partners and other than existing facilities that are relocated, are not eligible for satellite wagering commission distributions under this section. The satellite wagering facility commissions calculated in accordance with this subdivision shall be distributed to each satellite wagering facility and racing association or fair in the zone in which the wager originated in the same relative proportions that the satellite wagering facility or the racing association or fair generated satellite commissions during the previous calendar year. If there is a reduction in the satellite wagering
 commissions pursuant to this section, the benefits therefrom shall be distributed equitably as purses and commissions to all associations and racing fairs generating advance deposit wagers in proportion to the handle generated by those associations and racing fairs. If a satellite wagering facility is permanently closed other than for renovation or remodeling, or if a satellite wagering facility is unwilling or unable to accept all of the signals that are available to that facility, the commissions otherwise provided for in this subdivision that would be payable to that facility shall be proportionately reduced to take into account the time that satellite wagering is no longer conducted by that facility, or the payment of those commissions shall be eliminated entirely if the facility is permanently closed, and, in either case, the satellite wagering commissions not paid shall be proportionately redistributed
 to the other eligible satellite wagering facilities. For purposes of this section, the purse funds distributed pursuant to Section 19605.72 shall be considered to be satellite wagering facility commissions attributable to thoroughbred races at the locations described in that section.

(5) After the distribution of the amounts set forth in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, the remaining market access fees from advance deposit wagers originating in California shall be as follows:

(A) With respect to wagers on each breed of racing, the amount remaining shall be distributed to the racing association or fair that is conducting live racing of that breed during the calendar period in the zone in which the wager originated. That amount shall be allocated to that racing association or fair as
 commissions, to horsemen participating in that racing meeting in the form of purses, and as incentive awards, in the same relative proportion as they were generated or earned during the prior calendar year at that racing association or fair on races conducted or imported by that racing association or fair after making all deductions required by applicable law. Notwithstanding any other law, the distributions with respect to each breed of racing set forth in this subparagraph may be altered upon the approval of the board, in accordance with an agreement signed by the respective associations, fairs, horsemen’s organizations, and breeders organizations receiving those distributions.

(B) If the provisions of Section 19601.2 apply, then the amount distributed to the applicable racing associations or fairs shall first be divided between
 those racing associations or fairs in direct proportion to the total amount wagered in the applicable zone on the live races conducted by the respective association or fair. Notwithstanding this requirement, when the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 19607.5 apply to the 2nd District Agricultural Association in Stockton or the California Exposition and State Fair in Sacramento, then the total amount distributed to the applicable racing associations or fairs shall first be divided equally, with 50 percent distributed to applicable fairs and 50 percent distributed to applicable associations.

(C) Notwithstanding any provisions of this section to the contrary, with respect to wagers on out-of-state and out-of-country thoroughbred races conducted after 6 p.m., Pacific standard time, 50 percent of the amount remaining shall be distributed as commissions
 to thoroughbred associations and racing fairs, as thoroughbred and fair purses, and as incentive awards in accordance with subparagraph (A), and the remaining 50 percent, together with the total amount remaining from advance deposit wagering originating from California out-of-state and out-of-country harness and quarter horse races conducted after 6 p.m., Pacific standard time, shall be distributed as commissions on a pro rata basis to the applicable licensed quarter horse association and the applicable licensed harness association, based upon the amount handled in state, both on- and off-track, on each breed’s own live races in the previous year by that association, or its predecessor association. One-half of the amount thereby received by each association shall be retained by that association as a commission, and the other one-half of the money received shall be distributed as purses to the
 horsemen participating in its current or next scheduled licensed racing meeting.

(D) Notwithstanding any provisions of this section to the contrary, with respect to wagers on out-of-state and out-of-country nonthoroughbred races conducted before 6 p.m., Pacific standard time, 50 percent of the amount remaining shall be distributed as commissions as provided in subparagraph (C) for licensed quarter horse and harness associations, and the remaining 50 percent shall be distributed as commissions to the applicable thoroughbred associations or fairs, as thoroughbred and fair purses, and as incentive awards in accordance with subparagraph (A).

(E) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the distribution of market access fees pursuant to this subparagraph may be
 altered upon the approval of the board, in accordance with an agreement signed by all parties whose distributions would be affected.

(g) A racing association, a fair, a satellite wagering facility, or a minisatellite wagering facility may enter into an agreement with an ADW provider to accept and facilitate the placement of any wager from a patron at its facility that a California resident could make through that ADW provider. Deductions from wagers made pursuant to this agreement shall be distributed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter governing wagers placed at that facility, except that the board may authorize alternative distributions as agreed to by the ADW provider, the operator of the facility accepting the wager, the association or fair conducting that breed of racing in the zone where the wager is placed, and the respective
 horsemen’s organization.

(h) Any issue concerning the interpretation or application of this section shall be resolved by the board.

(i) Amounts distributed under this section shall be proportionally reduced by an amount equal to 0.00295 multiplied by the amount handled on advance deposit wagers originating in California for each racing meeting, except for harness racing meetings, provided that the amount of this reduction shall not exceed two million dollars ($2,000,000). The method used to calculate the reduction in proportionate share shall be approved by the board. The amount deducted shall be distributed as follows:

(1) (A) Fifty percent of the money to the board to establish, and to administer
 jointly with the organization certified as the majority representative of California-licensed jockeys pursuant to Section 19612.9, a defined contribution retirement plan for California-licensed jockeys who retired from racing on or after January 1, 2009.

(B) A person becomes a participant in the retirement plan when the person is licensed as a jockey in California.

(2) The remaining 50 percent of the money shall be distributed as follows:

(A) Seventy percent shall be distributed to supplement the trainer-administered pension plans for backstretch personnel established pursuant to Section 19613. Moneys distributed pursuant to this subparagraph shall supplement, and not supplant, moneys distributed to that fund
 pursuant to Section 19613 or any other provision of law.

(B) Thirty percent shall be distributed to the welfare fund established for the benefit of horsemen and backstretch personnel pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19641. Moneys distributed pursuant to this subparagraph shall supplement, and not supplant, moneys distributed to that fund pursuant to Section 19641 or any other provision of law.

(j) Amounts distributed under this section shall be proportionally reduced by an amount equal to 0.00295 multiplied by the amount handled on advance deposit wagers originating in California for each harness racing meeting, provided that the amount of this reduction shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000). The method used to calculate the reduction in proportionate
 share shall be approved by the board. The amount deducted shall be distributed as follows:

(1) First to the welfare fund established for the benefit of horsemen and backstretch personnel, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19641, and administered by the organization representing the horsemen participating in the race meeting, in the amount requested by the welfare fund. Moneys distributed pursuant to this paragraph shall supplement, and not supplant, moneys distributed to that fund pursuant to Section 19641 or any other provision of law.

(2) The amount remaining, if any, shall be utilized for the benefit of the horsemen as specified in a written agreement between the racing association that conducts the live harness race meeting and the organization representing the horsemen
 participating in the race meeting.

(k) Notwithstanding subdivision (j), amounts generated that were deducted from amounts handled on advance deposit wagering for harness racing meetings pursuant to subdivision (i), as that section read before the enactment of subdivision (j), that have been held in trust by the California Exposition and State Fair shall be distributed as follows:

(1) Fifty percent to the harness racing horsemen who participated in the racing meeting that concluded June 16, 2012, in the form of purses.

(2) Fifty percent to the California Exposition and State Fair in the form of commissions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.   (AB 1173)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.2. Satellite Wagering [19605. - 19608.8.]

19605.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the board may authorize an association licensed to conduct a racing meeting in the northern zone to operate a satellite wagering facility for wagering on races conducted in the northern zone at its racetrack inclosure subject to all of the conditions specified in Section 19605.3, and may authorize an association licensed to conduct a racing meeting in the central or southern zone to operate a satellite wagering facility for wagering on races conducted in the central or southern zone at its racetrack inclosure subject to the conditions specified in subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, of Section 19605.3 and the conditions and limitations set forth in Section 19605.6.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, no satellite wagering facility, except a facility that is located at a track where live racing is conducted, shall be located within 20 miles of any existing satellite wagering facility or of any track where a racing association conducts a live racing meeting. However, in the northern zone, a racing association or any existing satellite wagering facility may waive the prohibition contained in this subdivision and may consent to the location of another satellite wagering facility within 20 miles of the facility or track.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the Department of Food and Agriculture may approve not more than three satellite wagering facilities that are licensed jointly to the 1a District Agricultural Association and the 5th District Agricultural Association and that are located on the fairgrounds of the 1a District Agricultural Association or within the boundaries of the City and County of San Francisco. Before a satellite wagering facility may be licensed for the 1997 and subsequent calendar years under this subdivision, the department shall conduct a one-year test at the proposed site in order to determine the impact of the proposed facility on total state parimutuel revenues and on attendance and wagering at existing racetracks and fair satellite wagering facilities in the Counties of Alameda, San Mateo, Santa
 Clara, and Solano. Notwithstanding Section 19605.1, a satellite wagering facility may be located on property leased to one or both fairs. Notwithstanding any other law, the fairs may contract for the operation and management of a satellite wagering facility with an individual racing association or a partnership, joint venture, or other affiliation of two or more racing associations or fairs that are licensed to conduct thoroughbred meetings or simulcast wagering within the northern zone.

(d) Subdivision (b) shall not be construed to prohibit the location of satellite wagering facilities within 20 miles of any existing or proposed satellite facility established pursuant to subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 817, Sec. 1.   (AB 460)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.1.

With respect to the northern zone, the board may, with the approval of the Department of Food and Agriculture, also authorize any fair, in the northern zone that is eligible for an allocation of racing days pursuant to Section 19549, but which is not licensed to conduct a racing meeting or authorized pursuant to Section 19605.6, to locate a satellite wagering facility at its fairgrounds for wagering on races conducted in the northern zone if all of the conditions specified in Section 19605.3 are satisfied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 89.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.2.

With respect to the central and southern zones, the board may, with the approval of the Department of Food and Agriculture, subject to the conditions and limitations set forth in Section 19605.6, also authorize any fair, which conducted general fair activities in 1986 within the central or southern zone, and which is eligible for an allocation of racing days pursuant to Section 19549, but which is not licensed to conduct a racing meeting, to locate a satellite wagering facility at its fairgrounds for wagering on races conducted in the central or southern zone if all of the conditions specified in subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, of Section 19605.3 are satisfied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 90.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.25.

(a) The California Horse Racing Board may approve an additional 15 minisatellite wagering sites in each zone, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) No site is within 20 miles of a racetrack, a satellite wagering facility, or a tribal casino that has a satellite wagering facility. If the proposed facility is within 20 miles of one of the above-referenced satellite facilities, then the consent of each facility within a 20-mile radius must be given before the proposed facility may be approved by the board.

(2) An agreement in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 19605.3 has been executed and approved by the board. In addition to the requirements
 set forth in that provision, the agreement shall specify which components of its racing program, including live, out-of-zone, out-of-state, and out-of-country races, an association or fair will make available to the site. The terms and condition of the agreement, including all fees payable pursuant to paragraph (3) of that provision, a portion of which may be paid to horsemen in the form of purses, shall be subject to the approval of the horsemen’s organization responsible for negotiating purse agreements with the association or fair.

(3) The site is approved by the board.

(4) The wagers are accepted in an area that is accessible only to those who are at least 21 years of age.

(5) The board has approved the accommodation, equipment used in conducting wagering at the site, communications system, technology, and method
 used by the site to accept wagers and transmit odds, results, and other data related to wagering.

(b) Parimutuel clerks shall be available to service the self-service tote machines at these locations, and to cash wagering vouchers on a regularly scheduled basis.

(c) Until January 1, 2013, if the proposed minisatellite wagering site is in the northern zone in a fair district where the fair has operated a satellite wagering facility for the previous five years, the approval of the fair must be obtained even if the proposed location is more than 20 miles from the existing satellite wagering facility operated by the fair.

(d) For purposes of commissions, deductions, and distribution of handle, wagers placed at minisatellite sites shall be treated as if they were placed at satellite wagering facilities authorized under
 Section 19605, 19605.1, or 19605.2. Section 19608.4 shall apply to minisatellite wagering facilities.

(e) The written consent of the San Mateo County Fair shall be obtained prior to the approval of any minisatellite wagering site located within a 20-mile radius of its fairground.

(f) Minisatellite wagering facilities created pursuant to this section are not eligible for satellite wagering commission distributions pursuant to Section 19604.

(g) The board, in adopting regulations
 to implement this section, shall minimize the expense to both the operator of the minisatellite facility and the host racetrack.

(h) If there are more than 15 applications for minisatellite wagering facilities in any zone, the board shall determine which facilities will generate the largest handle, and give priority to the approval of those facilities. The board shall license a minisatellite facility for up to five years, and then review the operation and the size of the handle, and determine if it is in the best interest of horse racing to relicense the facility or, in the alternative, license another
 minisatellite facility that might generate a greater handle.

(i) Except as may be provided in the agreement required pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), no association or fair shall be required to make all or part of its racing program available to a minisatellite wagering facility. Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 19608.2, all costs incurred by the organization executing that agreement in excess of the amounts distributable to the organization from wagers placed at the site on that racing program, shall be borne by the minisatellite wagering facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 334, Sec. 1.   (SB 305)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.3.

(a) An organization described in Section 19608.2 has executed an agreement approved by the board with the association conducting a racing meeting and the satellite wagering facility. The agreement shall provide, among other things, for all of the following:

(1) The conditions for transmission of the signal.

(2) That the wagers made at the satellite wagering facility will be included in the appropriate conventional or exotic pool at the racetrack where the racing meeting is conducted.

(3) The agreement of the parties, if any, respecting the payment of fees or charges by one party to the other in substitution of, or in addition or supplemental to, the distributions of the amount deducted pursuant to the first paragraph of either Section 19605.7 or Section 19605.71. The agreement as to the payment of those fees or charges shall not operate to increase or reduce the amounts otherwise payable from the amount handled pursuant to this article, other than to a party to the agreement. Any dispute relating to the amount of fees or charges to be paid by any party as a condition of receiving the live audiovisual signal from an association or fair may be appealed to the board. However, nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to require an association or fair to execute an agreement.

(b) The accommodations and equipment used in conducting wagering at the satellite wagering facility and their location have been approved by the board.

(c) The communications system, technology and method used by the satellite wagering facility to accept wagers and transmit odds, results, and other data related to wagering has been approved by the board.

(d) (1) Any association or fair that operates a satellite wagering facility shall conduct wagering on all racing that is offered to the satellite wagering facility, except as otherwise provided in Section 19607.5 with respect to the northern zone, as long as the satellite wagering facility is not sustaining a loss on either a day meeting or night meeting, as determined by the board, and, if sustaining a loss on either a day meeting or night meeting, as long as the satellite wagering facility is reimbursed for that loss by either an organization described in Section 19608.2 or an association. Any association that operates a satellite wagering facility may, but is not required to, accept an audiovisual signal. Notwithstanding any other provision of this paragraph, an association that conducts a racing meeting and a fair that operates a satellite wagering facility may agree to provide an audiovisual signal and to accept wagering on less than all of the races. Acceptance of the audiovisual signal may be on such terms and conditions, including the payment of fees and charges, subject to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), as the parties may mutually agree.

(2) In calculating the loss, if any, for operating a satellite wagering facility for a night meeting, only the expenses incurred by the satellite wagering facility because of the acceptance of night wagers shall be considered, and no overhead expenses or expenses of the satellite wagering facility which would be incurred regardless of the acceptance of night wagers shall be considered.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law or any agreement under subdivision (a), for purposes of determining license fees and breakage at the racetrack where the racing meeting is conducted, wagers at a satellite wagering facility shall not be included in the conventional or exotic pools of the association conducting the racing meeting.

(f) The horsemen’s organization that represents the horsemen at the association that conducts the racing meeting on which wagers are accepted consents to the acceptance of wagers at the satellite wagering facility, except that the association or fair operating the satellite wagering facility may appeal the withholding of consent to the board that may determine that consent is not required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 91.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.35.

(a) Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 19605.3, no fee or charge authorized under that paragraph shall be paid by the operator of a satellite wagering facility that was licensed in the northern zone at any time prior to January 1, 2000. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, total on-track license fees applicable to all wagers made within the inclosure of associations conducting thoroughbred racing meetings in the northern zone, including wagers on out-of-zone, out-of-state, and out-of-country races, shall be reduced by 0.3 percent. In addition, the total on-track license fees applicable to all wagers made within the inclosures of associations conducting thoroughbred racing meetings in the Counties of Alameda and San Mateo shall, beginning on January 1, 2001, and each year thereafter, be further reduced by an additional sum equal to the amount of impact fees respectively received by each association from the Santa Clara County Fair during the 2000 calendar year. The reduction in license fees provided by this section shall be distributed solely to the association in the form of commissions. All other distributions from handle shall be as provided elsewhere in this chapter.

(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 19605.3, no fee or charge authorized under that paragraph shall be paid by the operator of a satellite wagering facility that was also licensed at any time during the prior year to conduct a live thoroughbred or quarter horse racing meeting in the central or southern zones or a live fair racing meeting in Los Angeles County. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on-track license fees applicable to all wagers made within the inclosure of an association conducting a thoroughbred meet in the central or southern zones, including wagers on out-of-zone, out-of-state, and out-of-country races, shall be reduced by 0.15 percent. The reduction in license fees provided by this section shall be distributed solely to the association in the form of commissions. All other distributions from handle shall be as provided elsewhere in this chapter.

(c) It is, and always has been, the intent of the Legislature that this section apply to impact fees charged by a thoroughbred racing association or a thoroughbred fair racing association in the northern zone, on satellite wagers accepted by satellite facilities operated by those associations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 72, Sec. 2.   Effective July 17, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.4.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 19605.3, the live audiovisual signal of night harness, quarter horse, Appaloosa, or Arabian races in the central or southern zone may be offered to satellite wagering facilities in the northern zone and the signal of those races in the northern zone may be offered to satellite wagering facilities in the central or southern zone. Racing associations may agree to accept that audiovisual signal. However, satellite wagering facilities located at fairs shall not be required pursuant to that agreement to accept more than five night racing programs per week.

(b) (1) With respect to the live audiovisual signal of night harness, quarter horse, Appaloosa, or Arabian racing, any association or fair that operates a satellite wagering facility shall conduct wagering on all racing that is offered to the satellite wagering facility, as long as the satellite wagering facility is not sustaining a loss on a night meeting, as determined by the board, and if sustaining a loss on a night meeting, as long as the satellite wagering facility is reimbursed for that loss by either an organization described in Section 19608.2 or an association. Any association that operates a satellite wagering facility may, but is not required to, accept an audiovisual signal. Notwithstanding any other provision of this paragraph, an association that conducts a racing meeting and a fair that operates a satellite wagering facility may agree to provide an audiovisual signal and to accept wagering on less than all of the races.

(2) In calculating the loss, if any, for operating a satellite wagering facility for a night meeting, only the expenses incurred by the satellite wagering facility because of the acceptance of night wagers shall be considered, and no overhead expenses or expenses of the satellite wagering facility that would be incurred regardless of the acceptance of night wagers shall be considered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 60, Sec. 3.   Effective May 3, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.45.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 19605, 19605.1, 19605.35, or any other provision of this chapter, if the racing association licensed in the year 2002 to conduct thoroughbred race meetings in San Mateo County is not licensed to conduct a horse racing meeting in that county in any subsequent year, the board may authorize satellite wagering in San Mateo County only as provided in this section:

(1) The board may authorize a satellite wagering facility to be located either on the fairgrounds of the San Mateo County Fair or on leased premises within the City of San Mateo. The facility may be operated by the fair or the fair may contract for the operation and management of that satellite wagering facility with an individual racing association or fair, or a partnership, joint venture, or other affiliation of two or more racing associations or fairs. The board may license a facility to the San Mateo County Fair pursuant to this section notwithstanding the mileage restrictions contained in Section 19605 or any other provision of this chapter to the contrary.

(2) Satellite wagering facilities licensed to the fair pursuant to this section are subject to the provisions of subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, of Section 19605.3, except that they shall not be subject to the provisions of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 19605.3 or any other impact fee or charge.

(3) Distributions pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 19605.7, and Sections 19610.3 and 19610.4 made by a satellite wagering facility licensed to the fair pursuant to this section shall be to the same beneficiary that received those distributions in the year 2002 from the San Mateo County Fair and the racing association licensed in the year 2002 to conduct thoroughbred race meetings in San Mateo County.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1063, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.46.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 19605, and Section 19605.1, the Alameda County Fair may, with the approval of the Department of Food and Agriculture, the authorization of the board, and subject to the conditions set forth in Section 19605.3, operate two additional satellite wagering facilities within the boundaries of the fair district. However, any facility situated in the City of Oakland shall be sited only with the concurrence of the racing association in Alameda County. The racing association in Alameda County shall have the opportunity to invest in the ownership and operation of any satellite wagering facility situated in the City of Oakland or within 20 miles of the racing association’s racetrack in Alameda County.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 202, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.47.

The Los Angeles County Fair may conduct satellite wagering at an additional location, situated not more than 20 miles from its fairgrounds, with the approval of the board. If the additional satellite wagering facility is within 20 miles of another racetrack, the consent of that racetrack or those racetracks shall be received as a condition precedent to approval by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 202, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.51.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 19605, and Section 19605.1, any fair that operated a satellite wagering facility on July 1, 2007, may, with the approval of the Department of Food and Agriculture and the authorization of the board, subject to the conditions specified in Section 19605.3, operate a satellite wagering facility on leased premises within the boundaries of that fair. Any fair that did not operate a satellite wagering facility on July 1, 2007, may, subject to Sections 19605 and 19605.1, operate one satellite wagering facility either on the property of the fairgrounds, or on leased premises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 594, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.52.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 19605, and Section 19605.1, any fair in the Counties of Kern, Shasta, or Stanislaus may, with the approval of the Department of Food and Agriculture and the authorization of the board, subject to the conditions specified in Section 19605.3, operate one satellite wagering facility within the boundaries of that fair.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 275, Sec. 2.   (AB 1074)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.53.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 19605, and Section 19605.1, in lieu of a satellite wagering facility that could otherwise be authorized by the board to the Sacramento County Fair, the California Exposition and State Fair may, with the approval of the Department of Food and Agriculture and the authorization of the board, subject to the conditions specified in Section 19605.3, operate one satellite wagering facility within the boundaries of that fair in addition to any satellite wagering facility authorized at its fairgrounds under those provisions.

(b) A satellite wagering facility authorized pursuant to subdivision (a) may be operated by agreement between the California Exposition and State Fair and an entity described in Section 19604, pursuant to the provisions of that section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 556, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.54.

Any racetrack in the central zone that conducted racing in 2007 but that has since closed may continue to conduct satellite wagering. If the racetrack site is no longer available for use as a satellite wagering facility, then the owner of the racetrack may conduct satellite racing at another location within that city, subject to approval by the board. If the owners of the racetrack which last conducted racing at that facility determine that they do not wish to operate a satellite wagering facility, then any other racetrack conducting racing in that zone may instead be authorized to open a satellite wagering facility. If there is no other racing association that wishes to operate a satellite wagering facility in that city, then any other person or entity may seek the approval of the board to operate a satellite wagering facility in that city. The board, prior to granting its approval, shall conduct a hearing on the issue, and afford parties the opportunity to be heard.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 594, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.55.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 19605, 19605.1, 19605.35, or any other provision of this chapter, if the Solano County Fair ceases to conduct live horse racing at the site of its 2002 racing meeting in any subsequent year, the board may authorize satellite wagering in Solano County as provided in this section:

(1) The board may authorize a satellite wagering facility to replace its existing facility to be located on the fairgrounds of the Solano County Fair or on leased premises within the county, at the option of the fair. The facility may be operated by the fair or the fair may contract for the operation and management of the satellite wagering facility with an individual thoroughbred racing association or fair, or a partnership, joint venture, or other affiliation of one or more thoroughbred racing associations or fairs. The board may license a facility to the Solano County Fair pursuant to this section notwithstanding the mileage restrictions contained in Section 19605 or any other provision of this chapter to the contrary.

(2) A satellite wagering facility licensed to the fair pursuant to this section is subject to the provisions of subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, of Section 19605.3, except that such a facility shall not be subject to the provisions of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 19605.3 or any other impact fee or charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 874, Sec. 3.   Effective September 26, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.6.

(a) In addition to satellite wagering facilities authorized pursuant to Sections 19605, 19605.1, and 19605.2, the board, with the approval of the Department of Food and Agriculture, may authorize any fair, in the County of Kern or Santa Barbara, eligible for an allocation of racing days pursuant to Section 19549, to operate a satellite wagering facility at its fairgrounds even though the fair is not licensed to conduct a racing meeting, and the fair may operate the facilities except for those functions to be performed by an organization described in Section 19608.2. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, Sections 19605, 19605.3, 19605.4, 19605.7, 19605.71, 19605.8, 19606, 19606.1, 19606.3, and 19606.4 apply to satellite wagering facilities authorized pursuant to this section.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the board provide, when feasible, for periods of at least 10 minutes between post times for live races conducted within California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 93.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.61.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the live racing or the audiovisual signals of any licensed association or fair in this state are disrupted or interrupted so as to cause the cessation of the live racing or audiovisual signals and the cause is a natural disaster outside the control of the association or fair conducting the racing or satellite wagering, as determined by the executive director of the board, the executive director may, at the request of the licensed association or fair and the organization representing horsemen at the race meeting, temporarily authorize the conduct of satellite wagering, including the transmission and reception of audiovisual signals, from any zone in the state or from any location outside this state. However, audiovisual signals emanating from within the state shall have preference over audiovisual signals from locations outside this state, and any transmission shall be subject to the conditions specified in subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, of Section 19605.3.
